Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 5. Execution and Stay Thereof

Cross references. —

As to stay of execution generally, see §§

1-17-201

to

1-17-210

.

§ 1-21-501.
Issuance of execution.

Execution for the enforcement
of a judgment except during the time it may be stayed, may be issued
by the judge who renders the judgment, or by his successor in office,
on the application of the party entitled thereto, any time within
five (5) years of entry of the judgment, or the date of the last execution
issued thereon.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 83; R.S. 1887, § 3504; R.S. 1899, § 4416; C.S. 1910, § 5279; C.S. 1920, § 6551; R.S. 1931, § 62-1301; C.S. 1945, § 14-901; W.S. 1957, § 1-641; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-501; Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “judge” for “justice.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

§ 1-21-502.
Form and contents of execution.

The execution shall be directed to the sheriff of the county, subscribed by the judge by whom the judgment was rendered, or by his successor in office, and dated the day of delivery to the officer for execution. The execution shall refer to the judgment by stating the names of the parties, the name of the judge, the county where and the time when the judgment was rendered and the true amount of the unsatisfied judgment. The execution shall direct the sheriff to:

Collect the amount of the judgment out of the personal property of the judgment debtor and pay it to the judgment creditor; and

Make return on the execution within thirty (30) days after receipt showing the manner of execution.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 84; R.S. 1887, § 3505; Laws 1890, ch. 78, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 4417; C.S. 1910, § 5280; C.S. 1920, § 6552; R.S. 1931, § 62-1302; C.S. 1945, § 14-902; W.S. 1957, § 1-642; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-502; Laws 1988, ch. 37, § 2; 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “judge” for “justice” twice in the introductory language in (a).

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

§ 1-21-503.
Endorsement on execution.

Before any execution
is delivered, the judge shall state in his docket and on the back
of his execution the amount of the debt or damages and costs, and
the officer receiving the execution shall endorse on it the time of
receiving the execution.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 85; R.S. 1887, § 3506; R.S. 1899, § 4418; C.S. 1910, § 5281; C.S. 1920, § 6553; R.S. 1931, § 62-1303; C.S. 1945, § 14-903; W.S. 1957, § 1-643; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-503; Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “judge” for “justice.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

§ 1-21-504.
Renewal of execution.

If any execution is not
satisfied, it may be renewed at the request of the plaintiff by the
judge or his successor, by an endorsement thereon and dated when made.
If any part of the execution has been satisfied, the endorsement of
renewal shall state the sum due and every such endorsement shall continue
the execution in full force for no longer than thirty (30) days. An
entry of renewal shall be made in the docket.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 86; R.S. 1887, § 3507; R.S. 1899, § 4419; C.S. 1910, § 5282; C.S. 1920, § 6554; R.S. 1931, § 62-1304; C.S. 1945, § 14-904; W.S. 1957, § 1-644; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-504; Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “judge” for “justice.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

§ 1-21-505.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1987,
ch. 198, § 4.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 87, related to summoning garnishees to answer interrogatories. For present similar provisions, see §

1-15-407

.

§ 1-21-506.
Receipt of money.

The officer holding an
execution shall receive all money tendered to him in payment thereof
and shall endorse the same on the execution. He shall give the payor
a receipt stating the amount paid and the account for which it is
received.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 88; R.S. 1887, § 3509; R.S. 1899, § 4421; C.S. 1910, § 5284; C.S. 1920, § 6556; R.S. 1931, § 62-1306; C.S. 1945, § 14-906; W.S. 1957, § 1-646; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-506.

§ 1-21-507.
Rights of surety.

When any judgment is
obtained against any surety the original judgment remains valid for
the use of the surety, who thereafter may obtain execution on the
judgment against the goods and chattels of the defendant. The surety
is entitled to a transcript of the judgment for his own use, which
has the same force and effect as transcripts in other cases.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 89; R.S. 1887, § 3510; R.S. 1899, § 4422; C.S. 1910, § 5285; C.S. 1920, § 6557; R.S. 1931, § 62-1307; C.S. 1945, § 14-907; W.S. 1957, § 1-647; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-507.

Cross references. —

For rights and remedies of surety upon paying judgment, see §

38-1-104

.

§ 1-21-508.
Execution against joint debtors.

An execution on a judgment
against joint debtors, one (1) or more of whom was not served with
summons, shall contain a direction to collect the judgment from the
joint property of all the defendants, or the separate property of
the debtors served with summons, specified by name.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 90; R.S. 1887, § 3511; R.S. 1899, § 4423; C.S. 1910, § 5286; C.S. 1920, § 6558; R.S. 1931, § 62-1308; C.S. 1945, § 14-908; W.S. 1957, § 1-648; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-508.

§ 1-21-509.
Right to sue surety.

In all cases of surety,
the plaintiff may sue the surety upon his bond if the conditions of
the bond are not performed.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 91; R.S. 1887, § 3512; R.S. 1899, § 4424; C.S. 1910, § 5287; C.S. 1920, § 6559; R.S. 1931, § 62-1309; C.S. 1945, § 14-909; W.S. 1957, § 1-649; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-509; Laws 1988, ch. 37, § 2.

§ 1-21-510.
Execution for costs.

A judge may issue execution
to enforce a judgment for costs in the same manner as in other cases.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 187; R.S. 1887, § 3603; R.S. 1899, § 4513; C.S. 1910, § 5377; C.S. 1920, § 6650; R.S. 1931, § 62-2001; C.S. 1945, § 14-910; W.S. 1957, § 1-650; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-510; Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “judge” for “justice.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

§ 1-21-511.
Right to stay of execution.

Except as otherwise provided,
any person against whom judgment is rendered may have stay of execution
by entering into a bond with the adverse party within ten (10) days
after rendition of the judgment, with good and sufficient surety,
resident property holders of the county, approved by the judge, conditioned
on the payment of the amount of the judgment, interest and costs that
may accrue. The bond shall be entered on the docket and signed by
the surety.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 92; R.S. 1887, § 3513; R.S. 1899, § 4425; C.S. 1910, § 5288; C.S. 1920, § 6560; R.S. 1931, § 62-1401; C.S. 1945, § 14-912; W.S. 1957, § 1-652; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-511; Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “judge” for “justice.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

In general. —

Undertaking to stay execution is required to be conditioned for the payment of the amount of the judgment, interests and costs that may accrue. Evans v. Cheyenne Cement Stone & Brick Co., 20 Wyo. 188, 122 P. 588,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1912).

§ 1-21-512.
Time for which stay granted.

Stay of execution shall be granted as follows:

For thirty (30) days on any judgment not exceeding fifty dollars ($50.00), excluding costs;

For four (4) months on any judgment over fifty dollars ($50.00) and not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100.00), excluding costs;

For six (6) months on any judgment in excess of one hundred dollars ($100.00), excluding costs.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 93; R.S. 1887, § 3514; Laws 1895, ch. 5, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 4426; C.S. 1910, § 5289; C.S. 1920, § 6561; R.S. 1931, § 62-1402; C.S. 1945, § 14-913; W.S. 1957, § 1-653; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-512.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 1-21-513.
Cases in which stay not allowed.

No stay of execution is allowed in the following cases:

On a judgment rendered against a circuit court judge for refusing to pay over money collected or received in his official capacity;

On a judgment rendered against a sheriff for failing to make return, making a false return or refusing to pay over money collected in his official capacity;

On a judgment against a surety for the stay of execution;

Where judgment is rendered in favor of a surety who has been ordered by judgment to pay over money on account of the principal;

On a judgment obtained by a sheriff on a bond executed to him for the delivery of property.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 94; R.S. 1887, § 3515; R.S. 1899, § 4427; C.S. 1910, § 5290; C.S. 1920, § 6562; R.S. 1931, § 62-1403; C.S. 1945, § 14-914; W.S. 1957, § 1-654; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-513; Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(i), substituted “circuit court judge” for “justice of the peace.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 1-21-514.
Recall
of execution.

If the execution issued
before the bond for stay or for appeal is given, and such bond is
given afterward and within the time allowed, the judge shall recall
the execution.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 95; R.S. 1887, § 3516; R.S. 1899, § 4428; C.S. 1910, § 5291; C.S. 1920, § 6563; R.S. 1931, § 62-1404; C.S. 1945, § 14-915; W.S. 1957, § 1-655; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-514; Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “judge” for “justice.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

§ 1-21-515.
Conditions under which execution issued notwithstanding stay.

When any person who is
surety for stay of execution moves from the county before expiration
of the stay, the judge shall issue execution on demand against the
goods and chattels of the party against whom the original judgment
was rendered. When any surety for the stay of execution becomes apprehensive
that by delaying the execution until expiration of the stay he may
be compelled to pay the judgment, the surety may file an affidavit
of the facts with the judge who rendered judgment whereupon the judge
shall issue execution against the judgment debtor. The surety is not
thereby discharged from liability, but may be proceeded against after
expiration of the stay.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 96; R.S. 1887, § 3517; R.S. 1899, § 4429; C.S. 1910, § 5292; C.S. 1920, § 6564; R.S. 1931, § 62-1405; C.S. 1945, § 14-916; W.S. 1957, § 1-656; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-515; Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “judge” for “justice” three times.

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

§ 1-21-516.
Giving
of further bond.

If within ten (10) days
after levying the execution the judgment debtor enters into a further
bond for stay of execution during the unexpired term of the first
stay, and pays costs of the execution issued against him, the judge
shall accept the further bond and recall the execution. The latest
bond shall first be proceeded against until it appears by the return
of the sheriff that there are no goods on which to levy, then proceedings
shall be instituted on the first bond given.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 97; R.S. 1887, § 3518; R.S. 1899, § 4430; C.S. 1910, § 5293; C.S. 1920, § 6565; R.S. 1931, § 62-1406; C.S. 1945, § 14-917; W.S. 1957, § 1-657; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-516; Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “judge” for “justice.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

Cited

in

Cheeseman v. Fenton, 13 Wyo. 436, 80 P. 823,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(1905).

§ 1-21-517.
Discovery
in aid of execution.

At any time after entry of judgment, the judgment creditor may obtain discovery by interrogatories, depositions or otherwise, from any person, including the judgment debtor, in accordance with the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure.

A person served with notice of discovery under this section shall hold for the benefit of the judgment creditor from the time of service all property, money and credits in his hands belonging to the judgment debtor or due to him.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 37, § 1; 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

deleted “for Justice Courts” at the end of (a).

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.